test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_algaas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - algaaš: #
    algaaš+N+Sg+Nom: algaaš
    algaaš+N+Sg+Gen: algaa
    algaaš+N+Sg+Acc: algaa
    algaaš+N+Sg+Ill: [algažân, algaažân]
    algaaš+N+Sg+Loc: algaast
    algaaš+N+Sg+Com: algain
    algaaš+N+Sg+Abe: algaattáá
    algaaš+N+Ess: [algažin, algaažin]
    algaaš+N+Par: [algažid, algaažid]
    algaaš+N+Pl+Nom: algaah
    algaaš+N+Pl+Gen: algai
    algaaš+N+Pl+Acc: algaid
    algaaš+N+Pl+Ill: algaid
    algaaš+N+Pl+Loc: algain
    algaaš+N+Pl+Com: [algaiguin, algaigijn]
    algaaš+N+Pl+Abe: algaittáá
    
  
